Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Eligible business entity" means a small business as defined
by Section 502 of Title 75 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
2. "Storefront material" means furniture placed near the
exterior front facade of an eligible business entity, and the
material used in the construction and design of the exterior front
facade of an eligible business entity.

Req. No. 12421 Page 1

B. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026,
there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant
to Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes in the amount
of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) for eligible business
entities who use western redcedar trees as storefront material.
C. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to
reduce the income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero
(0).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.

60-1-12421 AO 02/10/25













Req. No. 12421 Page 2